test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VLONG_NoExtra_aamoo_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giaamooensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giaamooensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giaamooensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giaamooenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giaamooenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giaamooenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giaamooenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giaamooenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giaamooenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giaamooenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giaamooenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giaamooenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giaamooenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giaamooenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giaamooenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giaamooenhimishiniibanan
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giaamooenhimishiniibanag
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giaamooenhimishiniibaning
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giaamooenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giaamooenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giaamooenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oaamooensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oaamooensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oaamooensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oaamooensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oaamooensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oaamooensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oaamooensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oaamooensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oaamooensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oaamooensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oaamooensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oaamooensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oaamooensimishiniibanan
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oaamooensimishiniibanag
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oaamooensimishiniibaning
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oaamooensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oaamooensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oaamooensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oaamooenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oaamooenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oaamooenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oaamooenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oaamooenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oaamooenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oaamooenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oaamooenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oaamooenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oaamooenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oaamooenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oaamooenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oaamooenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oaamooenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oaamooenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oaamooenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oaamooenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oaamooenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
